New York, session 2025-2026, A6099.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (iii) of paragraph 1 of subdivision b of 2 section 1612 of the tax law is amended by adding a new clause (C) to 3 read as follows: 4 (C) A commercial bowling establishment that is authorized by section 5 sixteen hundred seventeen-a of this article shall be entitled to a 6 vendor fee of not less than 20.25 percent in the first, second and third 7 years of video lottery gaming at such commercial bowling establishment, 8 20.0 percent in the fourth and fifth years and 17.5 percent in all 9 subsequent years. 10 § 2. Section 1617-a of the tax law is amended by adding a new subdivi- 11 sion a-1 to read as follows: 12 a-1. The division of the lottery is hereby authorized to license, 13 pursuant to rules and regulations to be promulgated by the division of 14 the lottery, the operation of video lottery gaming at commercial bowling 15 establishments that are duly licensed to serve alcoholic beverages, have 16 segregated areas that prohibit access to persons under twenty-one years 17 of age, and that are located in a county or counties in which video 18 lottery gaming has been authorized pursuant to local law. Such rules and 19 regulations shall provide, as a condition of licensure, that such bowl- 20 ing establishments to be licensed are certified to be in compliance with 21 all state and local fire and safety codes, that the division is afforded 22 adequate space, infrastructure, and amenities consistent with industry 23 standards for such video lottery gaming operations and to ensure that 24 persons under twenty-one years of age are prohibited access from such 25 areas, that employees involved in the operation of video lottery gaming EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09430-01-5 A. 6099 2 1 pursuant to this section are licensed by the racing and wagering board, 2 and such other terms and conditions of licensure as the division may 3 establish. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, video 4 lottery gaming at a commercial bowling establishment pursuant to this 5 section shall be deemed an approved activity for such bowling establish- 6 ment under the relevant city, county, town, or village land use or 7 zoning ordinances, rules, or regulations. No bowling establishment oper- 8 ating video lottery gaming pursuant to this section may house such 9 gaming activity in a structure deemed or approved by the division as 10 "temporary" for a duration of longer than eighteen months. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.